Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE
7. [OLD]

WAREHOUSE
RECEIPTS, BILLS OF LADING

AND OTHER
DOCUMENTS OF TITLE

§§490:7-101 to 490:7-603 REPEALED. L
2004, c 163, §34.

ARTICLE 7.

DOCUMENTS
OF TITLE

PART 1.
GENERAL

§490:7-101 Short title. This article
shall be known and may be cited as Uniform Commercial Code--Documents of Title.
[L 2004, c 163, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next